en: Jigsaw puzzle piece shape: Panoramic cut; Random cut; Shaped/whimsy pieces included; Standard (grid/ribbon cut); other
ru: Форма деталей пазла: Панорамная нарезка; Произвольная нарезка; Включает фигурные детали; Стандартная (сетка/ленточная нарезка); Другое
da: Formen på puslespilsbrikker: Panoramisk udskæring; Tilfældig udskæring; Formede/specielle brikker inkluderet; Standard (gitter/båndudskæring); andet
nb: Former på puslespillbrikke: Panoramisk kutt; Tilfeldig kutt; Formede/figurbrikker inkludert; Standard (rutenett-/båndkutt); Annet
fi: Palapelin palojen muoto: Panoraamaleikkaus; Satunnainen leikkaus; Sisältää muotoiltuja/erikoisia paloja; Vakio (ruudukko-/nauhaleikkaus); muu
zh-TW: 拼圖片形狀: 全景裁切; 隨機裁切; 包含造型/特殊形狀拼圖; 標準 (網格/帶狀裁切); 其他
fr: Forme des pièces de puzzle: Coupe panoramique; Coupe aléatoire; Comprend des pièces profilées/fantaisie; Standard (grille/ruban); Autre
es: Forma de las piezas del rompecabezas: Corte panorámico; Corte aleatorio; Piezas con formas/especiales incluidas; Estándar (corte en cuadrícula/cinta); Otra
it: Forma dei pezzi del puzzle: Taglio panoramico; Taglio casuale; Pezzi sagomati/decorativi inclusi; Standard (taglio a griglia/a nastro); Altro
lt-LT: Dėlionės dalių forma: Panoraminis pjūvis; Atsitiktinis pjūvis; Su figūrinėmis detalėmis; Standartinis (tinklelio / juostinis pjūvis); kita
bg-BG: Форма на парчето пъзел: Панорамно изрязване; Произволно изрязване; Включени фигурни/нестандартни части; Стандартно (мрежово/лентово изрязване); Друго
hr-HR: Oblik dijela slagalice: Panoramski izrez; Nasumični izrez; Sadrži oblikovane / tematske dijelove; Standardno (mrežasti/trakasti izrez); Ostalo
ro-RO: Forma pieselor de puzzle (jigsaw): Tăietură panoramică; Tăietură aleatorie; Include piese cu forme/fantezie; Standard (tăietură tip grilă/panglică); altele
el: Σχήμα κομματιών παζλ: Πανοραμική κοπή; Τυχαία κοπή; Περιλαμβάνονται κομμάτια με σχήματα/ιδιαίτερα σχέδια; Τυπική (κοπή πλέγματος/κορδέλας); Άλλο
nl: Legpuzzel stuk vorm: Panoramische snede; Willekeurige snede; Inclusief gevormde/grillige stukjes; Standaard (raster/lintsnede); overig
sl-SI: Oblika kosov sestavljanke: Panoramski rez; Naključni rez; Vključeni oblikovani/posebni koščki; Standardni (mrežni/trakasti rez); Drugo
hu: A kirakós játék darabjának alakja: Panorámakivágás; Szabálytalan kivágás; Formára vágott/egyedi formájú darabokat is tartalmaz; Hagyományos (hálós/szalagos vágás); egyéb
pl: Shapeselementów układanki: Cięcie panoramiczne; Losowe kształty; Z kształtowymi/fantazyjnymi elementami; Standardowe (cięcie siatkowe/wstęgowe); inny
th: Shapesทรงชิ้นส่วนจิ๊กซอว์: ตัดแบบพาโนรามา; ตัดแบบสุ่ม; รวมชิ้นส่วนรูปทรง/แฟนซี; มาตรฐาน (ตัดแบบตาราง/ริบบิ้น); อื่นๆ
cs: Tvar skládačky puzzle: Panoramatický řez; Náhodný řez; Včetně tvarovaných / figurkových dílků; Standardní (mřížkový / pásový řez); Jiné
ko: 직소 퍼즐 조각 모양: 파노라마 컷; 랜덤 컷; 모양/윔지 조각 포함; 스탠다드(그리드/리본 컷); 기타
vi: Hình dạng mảnh ghép hình: Cắt kiểu toàn cảnh; Cắt ngẫu nhiên; Có mảnh ghép tạo hình/ngộ nghĩnh; Tiêu chuẩn (cắt theo lưới/dải); Khác
pt-BR: Quebra-cabeça formato da peça: Corte panorâmico; Corte aleatório; Peças com formato especial incluídas; Padrão (corte em grade/fita); Outro
sv: Pusselbitars form: Panoramasnitt; Slumpmässigt snitt; Formade/specialbitar ingår; Standard (rutnäts-/bandsnitt); Annat
pt-PT: Forma da peça de puzzle: Corte panorâmico; Corte aleatório; Inclui peças moldadas/especiais; Padrão (corte em grelha/fita); outro
sk-SK: Tvar dielu dielika puzzle: Panoramatický strih; Náhodný rez; Vrátane tvarovaných/ozdobných dielikov; Štandardný (mriežkový/pásový rez); iné
de: Form der Puzzleteile: Panorama-Schnitt; Zufallsschnitt; Geformte/Whimsy-Teile inklusive; Standard (Gitter-/Bandschnitt); Sonstige
zh-CN: 拼图块形状: 全景切割; 随机切割; 包含异形/特殊拼图块; 标准（网格/条带切割）; 其他
tr: Yapboz parçası şekli: Panoramik kesim; Rastgele kesim; Şekilli/özel parçalar dahil; Standart (ızgara/şerit kesim); Diğer
ja: ジグソーパズルピースのShapes: パノラマカット; ランダムカット; 特殊形状/ウィムジーピース入り; スタンダード（グリッド/リボンカット）; その他